hr-HR: Standard označavanja nazubljenjem: Dvostruko; IPF; IWF; Nema; Ostalo
vi: Tiêu chuẩn đánh dấu nhám: Kép; IPF; IWF; Không; Khác
sv: Standard för räffelringar: Dubbel; IPF; IWF; Ingen; Övrigt
fi: Pyällyksen merkintästandardi: Tupla; IPF; IWF; Ei mitään; Muu
ja: ローレットマーキング規格: デュアル; IPF; IWF; なし; その他
it: Standard di marcatura della zigrinatura: Doppio; IPF; IWF; Nessuno; Altro
lt-LT: Rantavimo žymėjimo standartas: Dvigubas; IPF; IWF; Nėra; Kita
pt-PT: Padrão de marcação por serrilha: Duplo; IPF; IWF; Nenhum; Outro
en: Knurl marking standard: Dual; IPF; IWF; None; Other
th: มาตรฐานการทำเครื่องหมายลายกันลื่น: คู่; IPF; IWF; ไม่มี; อื่นๆ
nl: Karteling markeringsstandaard: Dubbel; IPF; IWF; Geen; Overig
ru: Стандарт разметки накатки: Двойной; IPF; IWF; Нет; Другое
zh-TW: 滾花標記標準: 雙重; IPF; IWF; 無; 其他
ko: 널링 마킹 표준: 듀얼; IPF; IWF; 없음; 기타
bg-BG: Стандарт за маркировка на набраздяването: Двоен; IPF; IWF; Няма; Друго
tr: Tırtık işaretleme standardı: Çift; IPF; IWF; Yok; Diğer
pt-BR: Recartilhado padrão de marcação: Duplo; IPF; IWF; Nenhum; Outro
fr: Norme des repères de moletage: Double; IPF; IWF; Aucun; Autre
zh-CN: 滚花标记标准: 双重; IPF; IWF; 无; 其他
cs: Standardní značení vroubkovaných hran: Duální; IPF; IWF; Žádný; Ostatní
sl-SI: Standard označevanja grče: Dvojno; IPF; IWF; Brez; Drugo
pl: Standard oznaczeń radełkowania: Podwójne; IPF; IWF; Brak; Inny
sk-SK: Norma pre vrúbkované značenie: Duálne; IPF; IWF; Žiadne; Iné
de: Standard der Rändelmarkierung: Dual; IPF; IWF; Keine; Andere
hu: Recézésjelölési szabvány: Kettős; IPF; IWF; Nincs; Egyéb
el: Πρότυπο σήμανσης ανάγλυφης επιφάνειας (Knurl marking standard): Διπλό; IPF; IWF; Κανένα; Άλλο
da: Angiver standarden for markering af rifling på stangen: Dual; IPF; IWF; Ingen; Anden
es: Estándar de marcado del moleteado: Doble; IPF; IWF; Ninguno; Otro
ro-RO: Standard de marcare cu zimțare: Dublă; IPF; IWF; Fără; Altele
nb: Standard for markering av rillemønster: Dobbel; IPF; IWF; Ingen; Annet